Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-252
Authority; borrow money and issue bonds; purposes.

The authority may borrow money and issue from time to time its bonds in such principal amounts as the authority determines necessary to provide sufficient funds to carry out its purposes which include:

(1) Carrying out the additional powers of the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority Act;

(2) The payment of interest on bonds issued under the act;

(3) The establishment of reserves to secure the bonds in an amount not to exceed twenty-five percent of the aggregate principal amount of the particular issue of bonds; and

(4) All other expenditures of the authority incident to and necessary and convenient to carry out its purposes and powers.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 52;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 52.